Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF83.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1046XS (1) 91 sb/js S.F. 83 Section 1. Section 481C.2, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. The department shall issue depredation permits and 3 deer shooting permits to any landowner who incurs crop, 4 horticultural product, tree, or nursery damage of one thousand 5 dollars or more due to wild animals. 6 Sec. 2. Section 481C.2A, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended 7 by adding the following new paragraph: 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. There shall be an annual deer depredation 9 season from January 11 through January 31 for any person 10 possessing a valid depredation license and tag or deer shooting 11 permit issued pursuant to this section on or after February 1 12 of the preceding calendar year. The method of take for the 13 deer depredation season shall be a rifle using a cartridge 14 approved by the department, a shotgun, a muzzleloader, a 15 handgun, a crossbow, or a bow. 16